Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-505
Proposed budget statement; estimated
expenditures; unencumbered balances; estimated income.

The
estimated expenditures plus the required cash reserve for the ensuing fiscal
year or biennial period less
all estimated and actual unencumbered balances at the beginning of the year or biennial period and less
the estimated income from all sources, including motor vehicle taxes, other
than taxation of personal and real property shall equal the amount to be received
from taxes, and such amount shall be shown on the proposed budget statement
pursuant to section 13-504. The amount to be raised from taxation of personal
and real property, as determined above, plus the estimated revenue from other
sources, including motor vehicle taxes, and the unencumbered balances shall
equal the estimated expenditures, plus the necessary required cash reserve,
for the ensuing year or biennial
period.

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 4, p. 671;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-924;

Laws 1993, LB 310, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 271, § 10;

Laws 2002, LB 568, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB111, § 3.